src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_nouns.lexc
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imiwaa' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:ima' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iman EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:imiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iman EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlObvPoss:imishining EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlProxPoss:imishiwaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgObvPoss:imishining EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgProxPoss:imishing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:imishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:imishiwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:imishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:imishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:imishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imishiwaa' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:imishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:imisha' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:imishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:imishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:imishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:imishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:imishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:iminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imiwaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:imiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:imibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:imibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:imibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:imiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:imiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:imibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:imibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iwaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:ibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:ibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:ibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:ibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:ibaniin EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_VVy                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_VVy_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ NA_Class=NA_VVy_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_VVy, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other              !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_VVy_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+NA+Dim+Loc:ensing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+LocDist:ensikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ObvPl:ensa' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ObvPl:ensan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ObvSg:ensan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc:enzhishing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+LocDist:enzhishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ObvPl:enzhisha' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ObvPl:enzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ObvSg:enzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ProxPl:enzhishag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ProxSg:enzhish EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc:enzhishidog EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:ensibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:ensibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:ensibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvSg:ensibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvSg:ensibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ProxPl:ensibaneg EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ProxPl:ensibaniig EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ProxSg:ensiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ProxPl:ensag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ProxSg:ens EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Voc:ensidog EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Loc:ing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+LocDist:ikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ObvPl:a' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ObvPl:an EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ObvSg:an EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+Loc:ishing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+LocDist:ishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ObvPl:isha' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ObvPl:ishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ObvSg:ishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ProxPl:ishag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ProxSg:ish EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+Voc:ishidog EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl:ibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl:ibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl:ibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg:ibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg:ibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ProxPl:ibaneg EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ProxPl:ibaniig EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ProxSg:iban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ProxPl:ag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ProxSg: EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Voc:idog EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_Vw                                           !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary
0:%>%> NA_Class=NA_Vw_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_Vw                                           !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_Vw_Flags
@R.Prefix.GI@ NA_Class=NA_Vw_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ NA_Class=NA_Vw_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ NA_Class=NA_Vw_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ NA_Class=NA_Vw_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_Vw                                           !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NI                                          !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Stems
aanikanootaagewinini:aanikanootaagewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
aatawe'ishkodawewinini:aatawe'ishkodawewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
aawazhiwewinini:aawazhiwewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
agaamiiwinini:agaamiiwininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
akakojiishi:akakojiishiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
anaamakamigoowinini:anaamakamigoowininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
andawenjigewinini:nandawenjigewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
anishinaabe-inini:anishinaabe-ininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
anokiiwinini:anokiiwininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
apishi-akakojiishi:apishi-akakojiishiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
ashawenaniisi:ashawenaniisiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
awakaani-mashkikiiwinini:awakaani-mashkikiiwininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
baapaagokozhiwewinini:baapaagokozhiwewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
babaamaasimoowinini:babaamaasimoowininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
babiizigaakizigewinini:babiizigaakizigewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
bagwajinini:bagwajininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
bakwadaabizhiwewinini:bakwadaabizhiwewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
bapichi:bapichiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
bibigwewinini:bibigwewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
biibaagadaawewinini:biibaagadaawewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
biisa'igewinini:biisa'igewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
bima'oojigewinini:bima'oojigewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
bimibizochigewinini:bimibizochigewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
binesi:binesiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
boozikado:boozikadow2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
dazhi-inini:dazhi-ininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
dibaabanjigewinini:dibaabanjigewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
digo:digow2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
gaanjweba'igewinini:gaanjweba'igewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
gagwejibizhiwewinini:gagwejibizhiwewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
ganawishkodesi:ganawishkodesiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
gichi-dibaakonigewinini:gichi-dibaakonigewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
gichijiimaaniiwinini:gichijiimaaniiwininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
gidochigewinini:gidochigewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
giiminakiiwinini:giiminakiiwininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
giiwasewinini:giiwasewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
gijiipizi:gijiipiziw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
gimoojishkiiwinini:gimoojishkiiwininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
giziibiigisaginigewinini:giziibiigisaginigewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
gwiingwiishi:gwiingwiishiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
inootaagewinini:inootaagewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
jiibaakwewinini:jiibaakwewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
maada'ookiiwinini:maada'ookiiwininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
maanataanadaawewinini:maanataanadaawewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
madoodoowinini:madoodoowininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
makadewikwonayewinini:makadewikwonayewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
mamaandaawichigewinini:mamaandaawichigewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
mashkikii-adaawewinini:mashkikii-adaawewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
mazina'igewinini:mazina'igewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
meskwaazhigwaneshi:meskwaazhigwaneshiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
midewinini:midewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
miishide'esi:miishide'esiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
miskwaadesi:miskwaadesiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
mooningwanesi:mooningwanesiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
naadamaagewinini:naadamaagewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
nanaandawii'iwesi:nanaandawii'iwesiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
niimi'iwewinini:niimi'iwewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
odaabaanikewinini:odaabaanikewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
omashkozisi:omashkozisiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
oshkiinzhigoo-mashkikiiwinini:oshkiinzhigoo-mashkikiiwininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
waabishkananiisi:waabishkananiisiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
waasakwanejiisi:waasakwanejiisiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
wemitigoozhi:wemitigoozhiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
wiiyaasi-dakoniwewinini:wiiyaasi-dakoniwewininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
zhaawanoowinini:zhaawanoowininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
zhoodaawinini:zhoodaawininiw2 NA_Class=NA_Vw_Boundary ;
